South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3635.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 26, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-26-42.  (A) The State Department of Education shall annually develop and approve guidelines for a uniform, intensive, and prolonged professional development program that includes coursework, certification, and endorsement requirements in all teaching areas, that: (1) integrates all existing statutory requirements for professional development in this State including, but not limited to, those found in Section 59-1-425(A); (2) all districts, working with the department, annually shall provide and require as in-service training to teachers employed in the district at no cost to the teacher; and (3) all certified teachers in the district annually shall complete. (B) Successful completion of the professional development program in each year of a renewal cycle that begins after June 30, 2026, will satisfy all renewal credit requirements for the certificate, and no additional renewal credit requirements may apply. For renewal cycles in progress before June 30, 2026, each year of completing the professional development program between that date and the final year of their renewal cycle will suffice to satisfy all renewal credit requirements for that cycle, and no additional renewal credit requirements may apply. (C)(1) The provisions of this section apply notwithstanding any: (a) regulation concerning the renewal of educator professional credentials; or (b) the Certificate Renewal Plan developed by the teacher certification office and approved by the State Board of Education, or any similarly purposed plan that regulates the renewal of professional educator certificates in this State. (2) To the extent a conflict exists between the provisions of this section and a regulation or renewal plan provided in item (1), the provisions of this section must prevail. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon on July 1, 2026. ----XX----